Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2115
Books and records.

A corporation shall keep, in addition to the books and records required by the Business Corporation Act, a record showing the names and addresses of all members of the corporation and the current status of loans made by each to the corporation. Members shall have the same rights with respect to all books and records as are given to shareholders in the Business Corporation Act.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 15, p. 308;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 207.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.